test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_NoExtra_apanjigan_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     apanjigan: apanjigan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1apanjigan: niapanjigan
     +Px2apanjigan: giapanjigan
     +Px3apanjigan: oapanjigan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     apanjigan+Dim: apanjiganens
     apanjigan+Con: apanjiganenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     apanjigan+Pos: apanjiganim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     apanjigan+Pej: apanjiganish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     apanjigan+Pos1Pl: apanjiganinaan
     apanjigan+PosPl: apanjiganiwaa
     apanjigan+PosObv: apanjiganini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     apanjigan+Pret: apanjiganiban
     apanjigan+VocPl: apanjigan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     apanjigan+Obv: apanjiganan
     apanjigan+Pl: apanjiganag
     apanjigan+Loc: apanjiganing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim: niapanjiganens
     +Px1apanjigan+Con: niapanjiganenh
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim: giapanjiganens
     +Px2apanjigan+Con: giapanjiganenh
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim: oapanjiganens
     +Px3apanjigan+Con: oapanjiganenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos: niapanjiganim
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos: giapanjiganim
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos: oapanjiganim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej: niapanjiganish
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej: giapanjiganish
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej: oapanjiganish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos1Pl: niapanjiganinaan
     +Px1apanjigan+PosPl: niapanjiganiwaa
     +Px1apanjigan+PosObv: niapanjiganini
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos1Pl: giapanjiganinaan
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl: giapanjiganiwaa
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv: giapanjiganini
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl: oapanjiganinaan
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl: oapanjiganiwaa
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv: oapanjiganini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1apanjigan+Pret: niapanjiganiban
     +Px1apanjigan+VocPl: niapanjigan***idig, idog***
     +Px2apanjigan+Pret: giapanjiganiban
     +Px2apanjigan+VocPl: giapanjigan***idig, idog***
     +Px3apanjigan+Pret: oapanjiganiban
     +Px3apanjigan+VocPl: oapanjigan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1apanjigan+Obv: niapanjiganan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pl: niapanjiganag
     +Px1apanjigan+Loc: niapanjiganing
     +Px2apanjigan+Obv: giapanjiganan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pl: giapanjiganag
     +Px2apanjigan+Loc: giapanjiganing
     +Px3apanjigan+Obv: oapanjiganan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pl: oapanjiganag
     +Px3apanjigan+Loc: oapanjiganing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos: apanjiganensim
     apanjigan+Con+Pos: apanjiganenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej: apanjiganensish
     apanjigan+Con+Pej: apanjiganenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: apanjiganensinaan
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl: apanjiganensiwaa
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv: apanjiganensini
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl: apanjiganenhinaan
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl: apanjiganenhiwaa
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv: apanjiganenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     apanjigan+Dim+Pret: apanjiganensiban
     apanjigan+Dim+VocPl: apanjiganens***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pret: apanjiganenhiban
     apanjigan+Con+VocPl: apanjiganenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Obv: apanjiganensan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pl: apanjiganensag
     apanjigan+Dim+Loc: apanjiganensing
     apanjigan+Con+Obv: apanjiganenhan
     apanjigan+Con+Pl: apanjiganenhag
     apanjigan+Con+Loc: apanjiganenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej: apanjiganimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl: apanjiganiminaan
     apanjigan+Pos+PosPl: apanjiganimiwaa
     apanjigan+Pos+PosObv: apanjiganimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     apanjigan+Pos+Pret: apanjiganimiban
     apanjigan+Pos+VocPl: apanjiganim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     apanjigan+Pos+Obv: apanjiganiman
     apanjigan+Pos+Pl: apanjiganimag
     apanjigan+Pos+Loc: apanjiganiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl: apanjiganishinaan
     apanjigan+Pej+PosPl: apanjiganishiwaa
     apanjigan+Pej+PosObv: apanjiganishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     apanjigan+Pej+Pret: apanjiganishiban
     apanjigan+Pej+VocPl: apanjiganish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     apanjigan+Pej+Obv: apanjiganishan
     apanjigan+Pej+Pl: apanjiganishag
     apanjigan+Pej+Loc: apanjiganishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganinaaniban
     apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganinaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganiwaaiban
     apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganiniiban
     apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganinaanan
     apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganinaanag
     apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganinaaning
     apanjigan+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganiwaaan
     apanjigan+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganiwaaag
     apanjigan+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganiwaaing
     apanjigan+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganinian
     apanjigan+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganiniag
     apanjigan+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     apanjigan+Pret+Obv: apanjiganibanan
     apanjigan+Pret+Pl: apanjiganibanag
     apanjigan+Pret+Loc: apanjiganibaning
     apanjigan+VocPl+Obv: apanjigan***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+VocPl+Pl: apanjigan***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+VocPl+Loc: apanjigan***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos: niapanjiganensim
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos: niapanjiganenhim
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos: giapanjiganensim
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos: giapanjiganenhim
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos: oapanjiganensim
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos: oapanjiganenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pej: niapanjiganensish
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pej: niapanjiganenhish
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pej: giapanjiganensish
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pej: giapanjiganenhish
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pej: oapanjiganensish
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pej: oapanjiganenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: niapanjiganensinaan
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+PosPl: niapanjiganensiwaa
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+PosObv: niapanjiganensini
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl: niapanjiganenhinaan
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+PosPl: niapanjiganenhiwaa
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+PosObv: niapanjiganenhini
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: giapanjiganensinaan
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+PosPl: giapanjiganensiwaa
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+PosObv: giapanjiganensini
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl: giapanjiganenhinaan
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+PosPl: giapanjiganenhiwaa
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+PosObv: giapanjiganenhini
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: oapanjiganensinaan
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+PosPl: oapanjiganensiwaa
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+PosObv: oapanjiganensini
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl: oapanjiganenhinaan
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+PosPl: oapanjiganenhiwaa
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+PosObv: oapanjiganenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pret: niapanjiganensiban
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+VocPl: niapanjiganens***idig, idog***
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pret: niapanjiganenhiban
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+VocPl: niapanjiganenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pret: giapanjiganensiban
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+VocPl: giapanjiganens***idig, idog***
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pret: giapanjiganenhiban
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+VocPl: giapanjiganenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pret: oapanjiganensiban
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+VocPl: oapanjiganens***idig, idog***
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pret: oapanjiganenhiban
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+VocPl: oapanjiganenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Obv: niapanjiganensan
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pl: niapanjiganensag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Loc: niapanjiganensing
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Obv: niapanjiganenhan
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pl: niapanjiganenhag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Loc: niapanjiganenhing
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Obv: giapanjiganensan
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pl: giapanjiganensag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Loc: giapanjiganensing
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Obv: giapanjiganenhan
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pl: giapanjiganenhag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Loc: giapanjiganenhing
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Obv: oapanjiganensan
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pl: oapanjiganensag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Loc: oapanjiganensing
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Obv: oapanjiganenhan
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pl: oapanjiganenhag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Loc: oapanjiganenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+Pej: niapanjiganimish
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pej: giapanjiganimish
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pej: oapanjiganimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl: niapanjiganiminaan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosPl: niapanjiganimiwaa
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosObv: niapanjiganimini
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl: giapanjiganiminaan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl: giapanjiganimiwaa
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv: giapanjiganimini
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl: oapanjiganiminaan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl: oapanjiganimiwaa
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv: oapanjiganimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+Pret: niapanjiganimiban
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+VocPl: niapanjiganim***idig, idog***
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pret: giapanjiganimiban
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+VocPl: giapanjiganim***idig, idog***
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pret: oapanjiganimiban
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+VocPl: oapanjiganim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+Obv: niapanjiganiman
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+Pl: niapanjiganimag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+Loc: niapanjiganiming
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Obv: giapanjiganiman
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pl: giapanjiganimag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Loc: giapanjiganiming
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Obv: oapanjiganiman
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pl: oapanjiganimag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Loc: oapanjiganiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl: niapanjiganishinaan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl: niapanjiganishiwaa
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv: niapanjiganishini
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl: giapanjiganishinaan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl: giapanjiganishiwaa
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv: giapanjiganishini
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl: oapanjiganishinaan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl: oapanjiganishiwaa
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv: oapanjiganishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pret: niapanjiganishiban
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+VocPl: niapanjiganish***idig, idog***
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pret: giapanjiganishiban
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+VocPl: giapanjiganish***idig, idog***
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pret: oapanjiganishiban
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+VocPl: oapanjiganish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Obv: niapanjiganishan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pl: niapanjiganishag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Loc: niapanjiganishing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Obv: giapanjiganishan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pl: giapanjiganishag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Loc: giapanjiganishing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Obv: oapanjiganishan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pl: oapanjiganishag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Loc: oapanjiganishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret: niapanjiganinaaniban
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1apanjigan+PosPl+Pret: niapanjiganiwaaiban
